Utah statutes.
41-22-12.   Restrictions on use of public lands.

(1)  Except as provided in Sections 79-4-203 and 79-4-304, federal agencies are encouraged and agencies of the state and its subdivisions shall pursue opportunities to open public land to responsible off-highway vehicle use and cross-country motor vehicle travel.

(2)  A person may not tear down, mutilate, deface, or destroy:

(a)  a sign, signboard, or other notice that prohibits or regulates the use of an off-highway vehicle on public land; or

(b)  a fence or other enclosure or a gate or bars belonging to the fence or other enclosure.



Amended by Chapter 289, 2009 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

